Maine, session 132, LD1238.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 30-A MRSA §4834 is enacted to read:
§4834. Small-cap Loan Guarantee Program
1. Definitions. As used in this section, unless the context otherwise indicates, the
following terms have the following meanings.
A. "Administrator" means the Maine State Housing Authority or an organization
contracted by the Maine State Housing Authority to administer the program.
B. "Affordable housing" means a housing unit that is affordable to a household with
an income at or below 80% of the area median income, as defined by the United States
Department of Housing and Urban Development.
C. "Loan guarantee" means the State's promise to repay a portion or all of a loan made
to a participant if the participant defaults.
D. "Low-income housing" means a housing unit that is specifically designed to serve
a household with an income at or below 60% of the area median income, as defined by
the United States Department of Housing and Urban Development.
E. "Participant" means an eligible investor or developer that participates in the
program.
F. "Program" means the Small-cap Loan Guarantee Program established in subsection
2.
G. "Small-cap project" means an affordable housing or low-income housing
construction or rehabilitation project with a value of $1,000,000 or less.
2. Small-cap Loan Guarantee Program established. The Small-cap Loan
Guarantee Program is established to provide a state-backed loan guarantee to an investor
or developer that commits to a small-cap project. The program is administered by the Maine
State Housing Authority, which may contract with an organization to administer the
program. The program must:
A. Offer state-backed loan guarantees to participants on financing for small-cap
projects;
B. Prioritize small-cap projects that provide long-term options or increase housing
stock for low-income housing, particularly in underserved areas; and
C. Require that a housing unit constructed or rehabilitated by a loan backed by the
program retains its original status as affordable housing or low-income housing for 10
years from the date of completion of the small-cap project.
3. Program eligibility. To be eligible for the program, an investor or developer must:
A. Submit a detailed proposal for a small-cap project that states:
(1) The number of housing units to be constructed or rehabilitated;
(2) The expected impact on the community; and
(3) The proposed financing structure;
Page 1 - 132LR1208(01)

B. Demonstrate financial stability and the ability to complete the small-cap project
under paragraph A on time and within budget;
C. Enter into a loan guarantee agreement with the administrator;
D. Pay the application fee under subsection 6; and
E. Comply with all state and local zoning, building and environmental laws, rules and
regulations.
4. Loan guarantee conditions. A loan guarantee for a small-cap project loan:
A. Covers an amount of the loan based upon the risk level of the loan as determined
by the administrator;
B. May cover up to 20% of the amount of the loan, subject to availability of funds in
the program; and
C. Remains in place for the duration of the loan repayment period up to 20 years.
5. Default; administrator's authority to bill participants. If a participant defaults
on a loan backed by a loan guarantee:
A. The administrator may assume responsibility for repayment of the loan up to the
guaranteed portion of the loan amount in accordance with the loan guarantee agreement
under subsection 3, paragraph C;
B. Upon repaying the loan, the administrator may bill the participant for the full
amount paid by the administrator, including any interest, penalty or fee related to the
default;
C. The administrator may pursue any legal means necessary to recover funds owed
under paragraph B, including filing a lien against the participant's property or seeking
a court judgment;
D. If the default is determined to be caused by a fraudulent action by the participant,
the administrator may pursue other penalties as provided by law; and
E. The participant must repay the full amount owed to the State under paragraph B and
any additional costs incurred by the administrator in collecting the amount within a
period determined by the administrator, not to exceed 10 years.
6. Application fee. The program is funded by an application fee paid by the
participant upon application to the program, which covers program administrative and
operational costs. The amount of the application fee is determined by the administrator
based on the total loan guarantee amount and risk assessment of the small-cap project under
subsection 4.
7. Evaluation; report. The administrator shall conduct an annual evaluation of the
program to assess the program's effectiveness in meeting program goals of increasing
affordable housing availability and supporting investors and developers of small-cap
projects. The Maine State Housing Authority shall submit an annual report based upon the
evaluation and detailing the use of program funds, the status of active loans backed by loan
guarantees and the number of affordable housing and low-income housing units
constructed or rehabilitated to the joint standing committee of the Legislature having
jurisdiction over housing and economic development matters.
Page 2 - 132LR1208(01)

8. Oversight. If the Maine State Housing Authority contracts with an organization to
administer the program, the Maine State Housing Authority shall exercise oversight over
the organization's administration of the program. The State Auditor shall review the
program annually to ensure compliance with this section and to monitor the financial health
of the program.
9. Rules. The Maine State Housing Authority shall adopt rules to carry out the
purposes of this section. Rules adopted under this subsection are routine technical rules
under Title 5, chapter 375, subchapter 2-A.
Sec. 2. Small-cap Loan Guarantee Program implementation. On or before
January 1, 2027, the Maine State Housing Authority or an organization contracted by the
Maine State Housing Authority shall begin accepting applications for the Small-cap Loan
Guarantee Program established under the Maine Revised Statutes, Title 30-A, section 4834.
Sec. 3. Effective date. This Act takes effect July 1, 2026.